Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-823
Family Navigator Program; establishment; evaluation.

(1) No later than January 1, 2010, the department shall establish a Family Navigator Program to respond to children's behavioral health needs. The program shall be administered by the division and consist of individuals trained and compensated by the department who, at a minimum, shall:

(a) Provide peer support; and

(b) Provide connection to existing services, including the identification of community-based services.

(2) The Family Navigator Program shall be evaluated. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of the quality of the interactions with the program and the effectiveness of the program as perceived by the family, whether the family followed through with the referral recommendations, the availability and accessibility of services, the waiting time for services, and cost and distance factors.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 7.